Utah statutes.
17-22-2.   Sheriff -- General duties.

(1)  The sheriff shall:

(a)  preserve the peace;

(b)  make all lawful arrests;

(c)  attend in person or by deputy the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals when required or when the court is held within his county, all courts of record, and court commissioner and referee sessions held within his county, obey their lawful orders and directions, and comply with the court security rule, Rule 3-414, of the Utah Code of Judicial Administration;

(d)  upon request of the juvenile court, aid the court in maintaining order during hearings and transport a minor to and from youth corrections facilities, other institutions, or other designated places;

(e)  attend county justice courts if the judge finds that the matter before the court requires the sheriff's attendance for security, transportation, and escort of jail prisoners in his custody, or for the custody of jurors;

(f)  command the aid of as many inhabitants of his county as he considers necessary in the execution of these duties;

(g)  take charge of and keep the county jail and the jail prisoners;

(h)  receive and safely keep all persons committed to his custody, file and preserve the commitments of those persons, and record the name, age, place of birth, and description of each person committed;

(i)  release on the record all attachments of real property when the attachment he receives has been released or discharged;

(j)  endorse on all process and notices the year, month, day, hour, and minute of reception, and, upon payment of fees, issue a certificate to the person delivering process or notice showing the names of the parties, title of paper, and the time of receipt;

(k)  serve all process and notices as prescribed by law;

(l)  if he makes service of process or notice, certify on the process or notices the manner, time, and place of service, or, if he fails to make service, certify the reason upon the process or notice, and return them without delay;

(m)  extinguish fires occurring in the undergrowth, trees, or wooded areas on the public land within his county;

(n)  perform as required by any contracts between the county and private contractors for management, maintenance, operation, and construction of county jails entered into under the authority of Section 17-53-311;

(o)  for the sheriff of a county that enters into an interlocal agreement for law enforcement service under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, provide law enforcement service as provided in the interlocal agreement;

(p)  manage search and rescue services in his county;

(q)  obtain saliva DNA specimens as required under Section 53-10-404;

(r)  on or before January 1, 2003, adopt a written policy that prohibits the stopping, detention, or search of any person when the action is solely motivated by considerations of race, color, ethnicity, age, or gender; and

(s)  perform any other duties that are required by law.

(2)  Violation of Subsection (1)(j) is a class C misdemeanor.  Violation of any other subsection under Subsection (1) is a class A misdemeanor.

(3) (a)  As used in this Subsection (3):

(i)  "Police interlocal entity" has the same meaning as defined in Section 17-30-3.

(ii)  "Police local district" has the same meaning as defined in Section 17-30-3.

(b)  A sheriff in a county which includes within its boundary a police local district or police interlocal entity, or both:

(i)  serves as the chief executive officer of each police local district and police interlocal entity within the county with respect to the provision of law enforcement service within the boundary of the police local district or police interlocal entity, respectively; and

(ii)  is subject to the direction of the police local district board of trustees or police interlocal entity governing body, as the case may be, as and to the extent provided by agreement between the police local district or police interlocal entity, respectively, and the sheriff.

(c)  If a police interlocal entity or police local district enters an interlocal agreement with a public agency, as defined in Section 11-13-103, for the provision of law enforcement service, the sheriff:

(i)  does not serve as the chief executive officer of any interlocal entity created under that interlocal agreement, unless the agreement provides for the sheriff to serve as the chief executive officer; and

(ii)  shall provide law enforcement service under that interlocal agreement as provided in the agreement.

